Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.56.083

Theft of livestock in the second degree.

(1) A person who commits what would otherwise be theft of livestock in the first degree but without intent to sell or exchange, and for the person's own use only, is guilty of theft of livestock in the second degree.

(2) Theft of livestock in the second degree is a class C felony.

[ 2003 c 53 s 75.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.